Washington statutes.
RCW 35.48.010

Special revolving fund for delinquent nonguaranteed bonds and warrants—Composition.

If any city or town has issued bonds or warrants payable from a local improvement or condemnation award fund, to which the local improvement guaranty fund law is not applicable, and if the assessment, or last installment thereof, against which the bonds or warrants were issued has been delinquent not more than thirty-two years, the city or town may create a special revolving fund and may provide moneys therefor by general tax levy, if the levy, together with other levies made or authorized by such city or town, will not exceed the levy which is legally allowed; or such city or town may place in said fund or advance or loan to said fund any money which it is not prohibited by law from advancing, loaning to or placing in said fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.48.010. Prior: 1961 c 46 s 1; 1943 c 244 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9351-11.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1943 c 244: "WHEREAS, there are many millions of dollars of delinquent and unpaid local improvement district and condemnation award bonds and warrants issued by various cities of the state and not protected by the Local Improvement Guaranty Fund, only a small part of which for the present at least can be paid and many of which will never be paid because of inability of property owners to pay the special assessments levied to provide funds for payment thereof and the depreciated value of the real estate which is the only security provided by present law from which payment of the assessments may be enforced; and, WHEREAS, the cities are not legally liable under existing law for payment of such bonds and warrants except as there are moneys available in the special fund from which the same are payable; and, WHEREAS, such cities and its citizens as a whole have derived benefit from the improvements installed with the proceeds or as a result of the issuance of such bonds and warrants; and, WHEREAS, the nonpayment of such unpaid and delinquent bonds and warrants not only causes great hardship and suffering on those who have invested money in such bonds and warrants, but also reflects discredit on the financial structure of the various cities involved, to the detriment of the cities as a whole and also the entire state; NOW, THEREFORE, this law is enacted to enable cities to provide some relief from the hardship imposed by such conditions." [ 1943 c 244 s 1.]